src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
!!!
!!!! Organisations
!!!!
LEXICON NP-LEX-ORG
<S i n n %  F é i n %+Prop:0 %+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+Com:0 %+Sg:0>	#; !! 
<F i a n n a %  F á i l %+Prop:0 %+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+Com:0 %+Sg:0>	#; !! 
<F i n e %  G a e l %+Prop:0 %+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+Com:0 %+Sg:0>	#; !! 
<L u c h t %  O i b r e  %+Prop:0 %+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+Com:0 %+Sg:0>	#; !! 

anois+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Anois      #; 
anois+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:ANOIS      #; 
LEXICON NP-Irregular

Gaeilge:	NPI-Gaeilge;
Gaelainn:	NPI-Gaelainn;
Éire:		NPI-Éire;
Londain:	NPI-Londain;
Meiriceá:	NPI-Meiriceá;
Sasana:		NPI-Sasana;
Eoraip:		NPI-Eoraip;
Breatain:	NPI-Breatain;
Life:		NPI-Life;
Conall:		NPI-Conall;
Feirste:	NPI-Feirste;
Uladh:		NPI-Uladh;

Éireannach:	NPI-Éireannach;
Eorpach:	NPI-Eorpach;


LEXICON NPI-Gaeilge
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Gaeilge		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg+DefArt:Ghaeilge		#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:Gaeilge		#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg+DefArt:Gaeilge		#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:Ghaeilge			#;

LEXICON NPI-Gaelainn
+CM+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Gaelainn	InitMut;
+CM+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg+DefArt:Ghaelainn	#;
+CM+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:Gaelainne	#;
+CM+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg+DefArt:Gaelainne	#;
+CM+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:Ghaelainn		#;


LEXICON NPI-Éire
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Éire			InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:Éireann	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg+DefArt:hÉireann	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Dat+Sg:Éirinn		#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Dat+Sg+hPref:hÉirinn		#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:Éire			#;

LEXICON NPI-Londain
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Londain		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg+DefArt:Londan	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:Londain		#;

LEXICON NPI-Meiriceá
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Meiriceá		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:Mheiriceá	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:Mheiriceá	#;

LEXICON NPI-Sasana
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Sasana			InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg+DefArt:Shasana	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:Shasana		#;

LEXICON NPI-Eoraip
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Eoraip	InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg+DefArt:hEorpa	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:Eoraip	#;

LEXICON NPI-Breatain
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Breatain		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:Breataine	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:Bhreatain	#;

LEXICON NPI-Life
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Life		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:Life	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:Life	#;

LEXICON NPI-Éireannach
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Éireannach		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:Éireannaigh	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:Éireannach		#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:Éireannaigh	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl+DefArt:hÉireannaigh	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:Éireannach	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl+DefArt:n-Éireannach	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl:Éireannaigh	#;

LEXICON NPI-Eorpach
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Eorpach		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:Eorpaigh	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+DefArt:Eorpaigh	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:Eorpach	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:Eorpaigh	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl+DefArt:hEorpaigh	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:Eorpach	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl+DefArt:n-Eorpach	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+DefArt:Eorpaigh	#;


LEXICON NPI-Conall
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Conall		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+DefArt:Chonaill	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:Chonall	#;

LEXICON NPI-Feirste
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:Feirste	#;

LEXICON NPI-Uladh
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Uladh		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:Ulaidh		#;   !!!!! check this 


!----------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON InitMut
#;
+Len:^IM^Sé		#;
+Ecl:^IM^Urú	#;
!**************************************************************************
! Moirfeolaíocht na nAinmfhocail Gaeilge (Morphology of Irish Nouns)
!**************************************************************************
! E. Uí Dhonnchadha 
!************************************************************************* 
 
Multichar_Symbols 

! PART-OF-SPEECH TAGS
+Noun	! noun
+Prop	! proper
+Masc	! masculine gender
+Fem	! feminine gender
+Com	! nominative case 
+Gen	! genitive case 
+Voc	! vocative case 
+Dat
+Sg	! singular
+Pl	! plural
+hPref	! 
+DefArt	! noun preceeded by definite article (an)
+Def	! noun preceeded by definite article (an)
+Idf	! noun without article (there is no indefinite article)
+Strong	! strong plural 
+Weak	! weak plural
+Emph	! emphasised - ár dteachsa, do theachsa, a teachsa
+Len	! lenite after simple prep. eg ar chat
+Prep	! prefix h before vowel
+Ecl	! after compound prep eg ar an gcat
+CM	! canúint na Mumhan, Munster dialect
+CC	! canúint Chonnachta
+CU	! canúint Uladh

+Place	! Place name
+Fam	! Family Name
+Pers	! Personal Name
+Adj	! +Adj+Base+DeNom are used for adjectives drived from proper nouns
+Base	! e.g. Spáinneach
+DeNom


! TAGS TO SIGNIFY WORD-START MUTATIONS
^M 	! masculine & feminine : initial mutations of singular nouns depend on 
^F	! whether the noun is masculine or feminine

^C 	! nominative, genitive & vocative : initial mutations of plural nouns 
^G 	! depend on the case
^V	!

^Sé	! Séimhiú (softening) Lenition - h added after certain initial 
	! consonants (bcdfgmpst)
	! eg "an cat" in gen. sg. becomes "bia an chait" (the cat's  
	! food) 

^Urú	! Eclipsis - a letter placed before word initial letter  (bcdfgpt)
	! eg  "g" before "c" - "an cat" in gen. pl. becomes "bia na gcat" 
	! (the cats' food) 

^tv	! "t-" before a vowel (eg éan : Nom. Sg. Masc. an t-éan - the bird) 

^hv	! "h" before a vowel (eg éan : Nom. Pl. Masc. na héin - the birds) 

^ts	! "t" before "s" 
	! eg sagart : Gen Sg.Masc. teach an tsagairt - the priest's house
^Def	! dntls rule after definite article

! TAGS TO SIGNIFY WORD-END MUTATIONS
^Caol	! Caolú (slenderise)- Attenuation : ie slenderise the end of word 
	! Usually by adding an "i" after  the last broad vowel 
	! aouáóú are broad vowels; ieíé are slender vowels  
	! eg "an cat" (the cat) in nom. pl. becomes "na cait" (the cats) 
^Lea	! Leathnú - Broadening eg an "i" is removed 
	! súil (eye); radharc na súl (eyesight)
^Coim	! Coimriú - Syncopation - the last unstressed vowel is dropped
	! eg saghas (type) ->saghs +anna, solas->soils+e (light) - with attenation also
^Ath	! Athrú (Change) - in certain plurals the ending changes : "e" -> "í",
	! "each" -> "í" and "ach" changes to "aí" etc.eg gealach -> gealaí (of the moon)
^VH	! Maintains vowel harmony of broad and slender vowels
	! Motto : "leathan le leathan agus caol le caol" (slender with slender and 
	! broad with broad)
^Emph	! emphatic forms
^IM	! general initial mutation e.g. mo chat, ar an mballa

!**************************************************************************  
!
!					L E X I C O N
!
!**************************************************************************  
LEXICON Root
	NP-Irregular;		! ORIGINAL TEST LEXICON
	NP-LEX-FAM;
	NP-LEX-FAM-EN;
	NP-LEX-PERS;
	NP-LEX-PERS-EN;
	NP-LEX-EIRE;
	NP-LEX-EIRE-EN;
	NP-LEX-TIR;
	NP-LEX-TIR-EN;
	NP-LEX-ORG;
	NP-LEX-DCU;
